Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202618-3552
Recall of trustees; terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 18-3552 to 18-3559:

(1) Filing clerk means the election commissioner or county clerk of the county in which all or the largest portion of the land area comprising a community improvement district is located;

(2) Qualified property owning voter means a person entitled to vote as provided in section 18-3514 for all trustees of a community improvement district other than those which may be elected only by qualified resident voters; and

(3) Qualified resident voter means a person entitled to vote as provided in section 18-3514 for all trustees of a community improvement district.

Laws 2026, LB1114, § 52.
April 17, 2026